csv2fst/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: wanishinaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: wanishinan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: wanishinaang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: wanishinang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: wanishineg
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: wanishing
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: wanishinowaad
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: wanishininid
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: wanishininid
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: wanishining
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: wanishinziwaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: wanishinziwan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: wanishinziwaang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: wanishinziwang
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: wanishinziweg
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: wanishinzig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: wanishinzigwaa
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: wanishinzinig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: wanishinzinig
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: wanishinzing
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: wanishinaambaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: wanishinamban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: wanishinaangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: wanishinangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: wanishinegiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: wanishingiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: wanishinowaapan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: wanishininipan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: wanishininipan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: wanishiningiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: wanishinziwaambaan
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: wanishinziwamban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: wanishinziwaangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: wanishinziwangiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: wanishinziwegiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: wanishinzigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: wanishinzigwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: wanishinzinigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: wanishinzinigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: wanishinzingiban
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: wanishinowaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: wanishinowanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: wanishinowaangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: wanishinowangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: wanishinowegwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: wanishinogwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: wanishinowaagwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: wanishininigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: wanishininigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: wanishinowiingen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: wanishinziiwaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: wanishinziiwanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: wanishinziiwaangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: wanishinziiwangen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: wanishinziiwegwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: wanishinziigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: wanishinziiwaagwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: wanishinziinigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: wanishinziinigwen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: wanishinziiwiingen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg: wanishinowaambaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg: wanishinowambanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl: wanishinowaangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl: wanishinowangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl: wanishinowegibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: wanishinogobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: wanishinowaagobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: wanishininigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: wanishininigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X: wanishinowiingibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg: wanishinziiwaambaanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg: wanishinziiwambanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl: wanishinziiwaangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl: wanishinziiwangibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl: wanishinziiwegibanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: wanishinziigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: wanishinziiwaagobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: wanishinziinigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: wanishinziinigobanen
     wanishin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X: wanishinziiwiingibanen
